Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-1203
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Developmental Disabilities Services Act, the definitions found in sections 83-1204 to 83-1208 shall be used.

Laws 1991, LB 830, § 3.